Colorado statutes. TITLE 33 Parks and Wildlife
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
33-6-109. Wildlife - illegal possession.

It is unlawful for any person to hunt, take, or have in such person's possession any wildlife that is the property of this state as provided in section 33-1-101, except as permitted by articles 1 to 6 of this title or by rule or regulation of the commission.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his possession in Colorado any wildlife, as defined by the state or country of origin, that was acquired, taken, or transported from such state or country in violation of the laws or regulations thereof.

(2.5) This section does not apply to the illegal possession of live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs or sperm) which is governed by section 33-6-114.5.

A person who violates subsection (1) or (2) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, depending upon the wildlife involved, shall be punished upon conviction by a fine or imprisonment, or both, and license suspension points or suspension or revocation of license privileges as follows:

For each animal listed as endangered or threatened, a fine of not less than two thousand dollars and not more than one hundred thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than one year in the county jail, or by both such fine and such imprisonment, and an assessment of twenty points. Upon conviction, the commission may suspend any or all license privileges of the person for a period of from one year to life.

For each bald eagle, golden eagle, rocky mountain goat, desert bighorn sheep, American peregrine falcon, or rocky mountain bighorn sheep, a fine of not less than one thousand dollars and not more than one hundred thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than one year in the county jail, or both such fine and such imprisonment, and an assessment of twenty points. Upon conviction, the commission may suspend any or all license privileges of the person for a period of one year to life. A person who possesses all or a part of a bald eagle or golden eagle shall not be in violation of this section if the possession is authorized by 50 CFR 22.

For each elk, bear, moose, or mountain lion, a fine of one thousand dollars and an assessment of fifteen points.

For each pronghorn, deer, or big game species as defined in the state or country of origin and not listed in paragraph (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection (3), a fine of seven hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen points.

For each violation of paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection (3) where any combination of three or more animals are taken or possessed, a minimum fine per animal as set forth in such paragraphs, to a maximum of ten thousand dollars per animal, or imprisonment for not more than one year in the county jail, or by both such fine and such imprisonment. Upon conviction, the commission may suspend any or all license privileges of the person for a period of from one year to life.

For each raptor not covered by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (3) and for each wild turkey, a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of ten points.

For all fish, mollusks, crustaceans, amphibians, or reptiles not covered by subsection (3)(a) of this section, a fine of thirty-five dollars and an assessment of five points for the first such animal and, for each additional such animal taken or possessed at the same time, an additional fine of thirty-five dollars per animal and an assessment of one point per animal.

For any wildlife not covered by paragraphs (a) to (g) of this subsection (3), a fine of fifty dollars and an assessment of five points for the first such animal and, for each additional such animal taken or possessed at the same time, an additional fine of twenty-five dollars per animal and an additional assessment of five points per animal.

(3.4) (a) In addition to the criminal penalties listed in subsection (3) of this section, there may be assessed a further penalty in the following amount for each of the following big game animals illegally taken:

For each bull elk with at least six points on one antler beam, ten thousand dollars;

For each mule deer buck with an inside antler spread of at least twenty-two inches, ten thousand dollars;

For each whitetail deer buck with an inside antler spread of at least eighteen inches, ten thousand dollars;

For each bull moose, ten thousand dollars;

For each bighorn sheep with a horn length of at least one-half curl, twenty-five thousand dollars;

For each mountain goat, ten thousand dollars;

For each pronghorn antelope with a horn length of at least fourteen inches, four thousand dollars.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-4.2-104 (1)(b)(II), C.R.S., no victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund surcharge shall be levied against the additional amount of the penalty imposed under this subsection (3.4). The victims and witnesses assistance and law enforcement fund surcharge shall only be levied against the amount of the fine imposed under subsection (3) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33-6-105, all moneys collected as additional penalties under this subsection (3.4) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit such moneys to the Colorado town, city, county, or city and county where the arrest for the offense was made or the citation for the offense was issued. Such additional penalties may be used to further law enforcement or wildlife related programs.

It is unlawful for any person to have in his possession in Colorado any nonnative or exotic wildlife except in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission. Any person who violates this subsection (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars. In addition, such person shall be assessed ten suspension points per incident for possessing an animal on the prohibited species list and five suspension points per incident for possessing any other nonnative or exotic wildlife species.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 870, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 90:

(2.5) and (4) added and IP(3) amended, pp. 1531, 1528, §§ 4, 3, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1584, § 12, effective May 31.

L. 98:

(3.4) added, p. 492, § 1, effective April 22.

L. 2003:

IP(3), (3)(a), (3)(b), and (3)(e) amended, p. 1942, § 6, effective May 22.

L. 2005:

(3)(d) amended, p. 476, § 10, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2008:

IP(3) and (3)(b) amended, p. 280, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(3)(g) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3694, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

IP(3.4)(a) amended, (HB 20-1087), ch. 49, p. 170, § 6, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 33-6-104 and 33-6-125 as they existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-110. Division action to recover possession and value of wildlife unlawfully taken.

The division may bring and maintain a civil action against any person, in the name of the people of the state, to recover possession or value or both possession and value of any wildlife taken in violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title. A writ of replevin may issue in such an action without bond. No previous demand for possession shall be necessary. If costs or damages are adjudged in favor of the defendant, the same shall be paid out of the wildlife cash fund. Neither the pendency of such civil action nor a criminal prosecution for the same taking shall be a bar to the other; nor shall anything in this section affect the right of seizure under other provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title. The following shall be considered the minimum value of the wildlife unlawfully taken or possessed and may be recovered in addition to recovery of possession of the wildlife:

For each eagle, member of an endangered species, rocky mountain

goat, moose, rocky mountain bighorn sheep, or lynx ....................
$1,000

For each elk or member of a threatened species or subspecies .................... $700

For each pronghorn, deer, black bear, or mountain lion .................... $500

For each raptor not covered by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection

(1) and each wild turkey ....................
$200

For each member of nongame or small game species or subspecies

not covered by paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection (1) ....................
$100

For each game fish not covered by paragraph (a) or (b) of this

subsection (1) ....................
$35

No verdict or judgment recovered by the state in such an action shall be for a sum less than the sum fixed in this section but may be for such greater sum as the evidence may show the value of the wildlife to have been when living and uninjured.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 871, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2005:

(1)(c) amended, p. 476, § 11, effective January 1, 2006.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-104 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-111. Inspection of license and wildlife - check stations - failure to tag - eluding an officer.

Any person who hunts, traps, fishes, or possesses wildlife for any purpose shall, when requested to do so by an officer of the division of parks and wildlife or other peace officer empowered to enforce articles 1 to 6 of this title 33, produce:

All applicable licenses that the division issued to the person;

All firearms;

All records required to be maintained by articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 or by any rule of the commission;

All wildlife; and

Any personal identification documents.

Any person who refuses to permit inspection of the person's personal identification documents, licenses, firearms, records, or wildlife is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred fifty dollars and an assessment of five license suspension points.

The division is authorized to establish check stations, as needed, at locations within the state to aid in the management of wildlife and the enforcement of articles 1 to 6 of this title and the rules or regulations of the commission. Persons who encounter check stations, whether in possession of wildlife or not, shall stop and produce licenses issued by the division, firearms, and wildlife for inspection by division personnel. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of five license suspension points.

Any person who fails to void the person's license or carcass tag as required by commission rule is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

It is unlawful for any person to elude or attempt to elude by any means a Colorado wildlife officer or other peace officer after having received a visual or audible signal such as a red or red and blue light, siren, or voice command directing the person to stop. Any person who violates this subsection (4) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and is assessed ten license suspension points. In addition, the court shall require the person to pay for any damages caused to any public or private real or personal property damaged while eluding an officer.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 872, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1630, § 69, effective August 6.

L. 2019:

(1) and (3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3694, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3259, § 552, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 33-6-102, 33-6-108, and 33-6-110 as they existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-112. Evidence of wildlife sex and species.

The commission may establish by rules or regulations requirements for preserving the evidence of sex or species or both sex and species of wildlife taken under the provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title. It is unlawful for any person to possess any wildlife or considerable portion thereof in violation of such rules or regulations. For the purposes of this section, the evidence of species or sex may be one or more of the following: Head, antlers, horns, testes, scrotum, udder, spurred leg, wing, skin, or plumage in sufficient amount to allow the evidence of species or sex to be determined by ordinary inspection. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall, with respect to big game, be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points or shall, with respect to all other wildlife, be punished by a fine of fifty dollars and an assessment of five license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 872, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-109 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-113. Illegal sale of wildlife.

Except as otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title or by rule of the commission, it is unlawful for any person to knowingly sell or purchase, or knowingly offer for sale or purchase, wildlife or to solicit another person in the illegal hunting or taking of wildlife for the purposes of monetary or commercial gain or profit.

For the purposes of this section, it is deemed to be a sale of wildlife if a person, for monetary or other consideration, provides unregistered outfitting services as defined in article 145 of title 12.

Any person who violates this section:

With respect to big game, endangered species, or eagles, commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S. Upon such conviction, the commission may suspend any or all wildlife license privileges of the person for a minimum of one year to life.

With respect to all other wildlife, commits a class 2 misdemeanor and is assessed twenty license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 873, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

(2)(a) amended, p. 659, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) and (2)(a) amended, p. 1586, § 13, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1544, § 294, effective October 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 537, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2019:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1720, § 220, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2)(b) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3259, § 553, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 33-6-125 and 33-6-126 as they existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2)(a), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

33-6-113.5. Illegal businesses on division property.

It is unlawful to provide goods or services for compensation on property owned or managed by the division unless permitted by commission rule.

A person who violates this section commits a petty offense and is assessed twenty license suspension points.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1033, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3260, § 554, effective March 1, 2022.

33-6-114. Transportation, importation, exportation, and release of wildlife.

It is unlawful for any person to transport or to export any wildlife or portion thereof within or from this state except in accordance with the rules or regulations of the commission.

It is unlawful for any person to import any live wildlife into this state unless an importation license is obtained prior to importation, a current and valid health certificate accompanies each shipment, and such importation is in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission.

It is unlawful for any person to release, or knowingly allow the escape of, any live native or nonnative or exotic wildlife in Colorado except in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission.

(3.5) This section does not apply to the transportation, importation, exportation, and release of live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs and sperm) which are governed by section 33-6-114.5.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars for violations involving native wildlife and by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars for violations involving nonnative or exotic wildlife. In addition, for violations involving either native wildlife or nonnative or exotic wildlife, five license suspension points per incident may be assessed by the division against an individual's license privileges.

This section shall not apply to aquatic nuisance species, which shall be governed by article 10.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 873, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 90:

(3) and (4) amended and (3.5) added, pp. 1529, 1531, §§ 4, 5, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(5) added, p. 1588, § 3, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

(4) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3695, § 8, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-114.5. Native and nonnative fish - possession, transportation, importation, exportation, and release - penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to possess, transport, import, or export any live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs or sperm) except in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission.

It is unlawful for any person to possess live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs or sperm) which are infected with any disease designated by rule and regulation of the commission as a disease detrimental to existing fish populations or habitats unless the division is notified within two business days after the discovery of the presence of such a disease.

It is unlawful for any person to possess live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs or sperm) which are of a species designated by rule and regulation of the commission as detrimental to existing fish populations or habitats.

It is unlawful for any person to import any live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs or sperm) into this state unless, in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission, both a current and valid importation license and health certificate are obtained prior to importation.

It is unlawful for any person to release any live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs or sperm) in this state except in accordance with the rules and regulations of the commission.

It is unlawful for any person to transport, import, export, or release any live native or nonnative fish or viable gametes (eggs or sperm) in violation of any quarantine order or disposition plan issued in accordance with any provisions of articles 1 to 6 of this title or any rule or regulation of the commission.

Any person who violates subsection (4) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Any person who violates subsection (2), (3), (5), or (6) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand dollars. Such person is liable for all damages and costs associated with such unlawful release, including, but not limited to, the costs of eradication or removal.

Repealed.

This section shall not apply to aquatic nuisance species, which shall be governed by article 10.5 of this title.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire section added, p. 1531, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 91:

(7)(c) added, p. 199, § 5, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

(7)(c) repealed, p. 1942, § 7, effective May 22.

L. 2008:

(8) added, p. 1589, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(7)(a) and (7)(b) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3260, § 555, effective March 1, 2022.

33-6-115. Theft of wildlife - tampering with trap.

It is unlawful for any person to take from another person, without his permission, any wildlife lawfully acquired and possessed by him. Any person who violates this subsection (1) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than five hundred dollars and an assessment of twenty license suspension points. Any person having wildlife taken from him unlawfully as prohibited in this subsection (1) shall be entitled to compensation as ordered by the court.

It is unlawful for any person to interfere with, disturb, remove, or otherwise tamper with any trap, snare, or other device that has been legally set. Any person who violates this subsection (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 873, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-122 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-115.5. Hunting, trapping, and fishing - intentional interference with lawful activities.

No person shall willfully prevent or interfere with the lawful participation of any individual in the activity of hunting, trapping, or fishing in accordance with this article.

A person commits intentional interference with lawful hunting, trapping, and fishing activities if he:

Acts with intent to alarm, distract, or frighten prey and causes prey to flee by:

Use of any natural or artificial source of noise or light;

Giving chase to prey on foot or by use of any vehicle;

Throwing objects or making movements;

Intentionally harasses any person lawfully participating in the activity of hunting, trapping, and fishing by use of threats or actions;

Erects barriers with the intent to deny ingress to lawfully designated hunting, trapping, and fishing areas;

Intentionally interjects himself into the line of fire;

Engages in any other conduct with the intent to disrupt or prevent lawful hunting, trapping, and fishing activities.

Any person who violates this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and is assessed twenty license suspension points.

Any person convicted of a violation of this section shall be liable for all damages incurred by the individual whose lawful activity was obstructed and for all court costs of prosecution.

Nothing in this section shall limit the actions of law enforcement officers and personnel of the division of parks and wildlife in the performance of their official duties nor apply to landowners, tenants, or leaseholders exercising their legal rights to the enjoyment of land, including, but not limited to, farming, ranching, and restricting trespass, nor will anything in this section be construed to prohibit any incidental interference arising from the lawful use of land or water.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 1161, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 1107, § 50, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1943, § 8, effective May 22.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3260, § 556, effective March 1, 2022.

33-6-116. Hunting, trapping, or fishing on private property - posting public lands.

It is unlawful for any person to enter upon privately owned land or lands under the control of the state board of land commissioners to hunt or take any wildlife by hunting, trapping, or fishing without first obtaining permission from the owner or person in possession of such land.

It is unlawful for any person to post, sign, or indicate that any public lands within this state, not held under an exclusive control lease, are privately owned lands.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of twenty license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 874, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 1269, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1586, § 14, effective May 31.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3695, § 9, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-123 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-117. Willful destruction of wildlife - legislative intent.

Except as is otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title or by rule of the commission, it is unlawful for a person:

To hunt or take, or to solicit another person to hunt or take, wildlife and detach or remove, with the intent to abandon the carcass or body, only the head, hide, claws, teeth, antlers, horns, internal organs, or feathers or any or all of such parts;

To intentionally abandon the carcass or body of taken wildlife; or

To take and intentionally abandon wildlife.

A person who violates this subsection (1), with respect to:

Big game, eagles, and endangered species, commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, C.R.S., and, in addition, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars nor more than twenty thousand dollars. For offenses committed on or after July 1, 1985, the fine shall be in an amount within the presumptive range set out in section 18-1.3-401 (1)(a)(III), C.R.S. Upon such conviction, the commission shall assess twenty license suspension points and suspend the wildlife license privileges for one year to life of the person convicted.

All other wildlife species, commits a class 2 misdemeanor and is assessed twenty license suspension points.

The purpose and intent of this section is to protect the wildlife of this state from wanton, ruthless, or wasteful destruction or mutilation for their heads, hides, claws, teeth, antlers, horns, internal organs, or feathers, from being taken and abandoned, or any or all of the foregoing, and the provisions of this section shall be so construed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 874, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 85:

(1)(a) amended, p. 659, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 94:

IP(1) amended, p. 1586, § 15, effective May 31.

L. 2002:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1544, § 295, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a), and (2) amended, p. 1029, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1) amended, p. 537, § 2, effective August 5.

L. 2021:

(1)(b)(II) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3260, § 557, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-106 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (1)(a), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

33-6-118. Killing of big game animals in contest prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person to advertise, conduct or offer to conduct, or otherwise promote or participate in any contest or competition involving two or more persons and the monetary payment or awarding of any other prize when the object of the contest or competition involves the killing of any big game or the display for comparison of any big game or any part thereof. Certificates issued by organizations solely for registration and recognition of animals legally taken are not prohibited. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars and an assessment of twenty license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 874, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-141 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-119. Pursuit of wounded game - waste of edible game wildlife - use of wildlife as bait.

Except as provided in section 33-6-116 (1), it is unlawful for a person who shoots at, wounds, or may have wounded game wildlife to fail to make a reasonable attempt to locate the game wildlife suspected of injury and take it into the person's possession. A person who violates this subsection (1)(a) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall, with respect to big game, be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points or shall, with respect to small game, be punished by a fine of fifty dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points.

If wounded game goes onto private property, the person who wounded the game shall make a reasonable attempt to contact the landowner or person in charge of such land before pursuing the wounded game.

If the hunter is unaware of the location of wildlife after shooting at it, failing to go immediately to the location of such wildlife when the shot was fired is not a reasonable attempt to locate game.

Except as otherwise provided in articles 1 to 6 of this title 33 or by rule of the commission, it is unlawful for a person to fail to reasonably attempt to dress or care for and provide for human consumption the edible portions of game wildlife. A person who violates this subsection (2) commits a class 2 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall, with respect to big game, be punished by a fine of three hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points or shall, with respect to all other game wildlife, be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

It is unlawful for any person to use wildlife as bait unless otherwise provided by rule of the commission. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 875, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) and (2) amended and (1)(c) added, p. 1032, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

(1)(a) and (3) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3695, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3260, § 558, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-107 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-120. Hunting, trapping, or fishing out of season or in a closed area.

It is unlawful for any person to fish, trap, hunt, or take any wildlife outside of the season established by or in an area closed by commission rule. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine and an assessment of license suspension points as follows:

For each incident that is not related to the hunting or taking of a big game animal, the fine shall be equal to twice the cost of the most expensive license for such species and ten license suspension points shall be assessed;

For the hunting or taking of big game, fifteen license suspension points and a fine that is equal to twice the cost of the most expensive license for such species shall be assessed.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 875, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1586, § 16, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1943, § 9, effective May 22.

33-6-121. Hunters to wear fluorescent pink or daylight fluorescent orange garments.

Unless otherwise provided by commission rule, it is unlawful for any person to hunt or take elk, deer, pronghorn, moose, or black bear with any firearm unless the person is wearing fluorescent pink or daylight fluorescent orange garments that meet the following requirements:

Garments are solid fluorescent pink or daylight fluorescent orange colored material and are of sufficient brightness to be seen conspicuously from a reasonable distance.

Garments shall be a minimum of five hundred square inches and shall be worn as an outer garment above the waist, part of which shall be a hat or head covering visible from all directions.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars and an assessment of five license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 875, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

IP(1) amended, p. 1587, § 17, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

IP(1) amended, p. 1033, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

IP(1) amended, p. 476, § 12, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2016:

IP(1) and (1)(a) amended, (SB 16-068), ch. 75, p. 197, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2019:

(2) amended, (HB 19-1026), ch. 423, p. 3696, § 11, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-111 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the short title ("Respect the Great Outdoors Act") and the legislative declaration in HB 19-1026, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 423, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.

33-6-122. Hunting in a careless manner - definition.

It is unlawful for any person to hunt or take wildlife in a careless manner or to discharge a firearm or release an arrow in a careless manner that endangers human life or property.

For the purposes of this section, "careless" means failing to exercise the degree of reasonable care that would be exercised by a person of ordinary prudence under all the existing circumstances.

Except as provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section, a person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for up to one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment, and an assessment of twenty license suspension points.

A person who violates this section is subject to a fine of five hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points if at the time of the violation the person:

Was hunting under a valid big game license;

Killed a big game animal that is not covered by the license; and

Immediately field dressed the animal; and

Reported the killing of the animal to the division.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 876, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1587, § 18, effective May 31.

L. 2020:

Entire section amended, (HB 20-1087), ch. 49, p. 170, § 7, effective March 20.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-113 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-123. Hunting under the influence.

It is unlawful for any person who is under the influence of alcohol or any controlled substance, as defined in section 18-18-102 (5), C.R.S., or any other drug to a degree that renders such person incapable of safely operating a firearm or bow and arrow to hunt or take any wildlife in this state. The fact that any person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use such controlled substance or drug under the laws of this state shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section. For the purposes of this section, being under the influence of any drug shall include the use of glue-sniffing, aerosol inhalation, or the inhalation of any other toxic vapor. Any person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars nor more than one thousand dollars or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both such fine and imprisonment, and an assessment of twenty license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 876, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1587, § 19, effective May 31.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (HB 12-1311), ch. 281, p. 1630, § 81, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-112 as it existed prior to 1984.

33-6-124. Use of a motor vehicle or aircraft - rules.

Unless otherwise permitted by commission rule, it is unlawful for a person to hunt, take, or harass wildlife from or with a motor vehicle. A person who violates this paragraph (a) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

Unless otherwise permitted by commission rule, it is unlawful for any person to discharge a firearm or release an arrow from a motor vehicle with the intent to take wildlife. A person who violates this paragraph (b) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of ten license suspension points.

It is unlawful for any person airborne in any aircraft to spot or locate any wildlife and communicate its location to a person on the ground as an aid to hunting or pursuing wildlife; and it is unlawful for such airborne person or person on the ground receiving such communication to pursue, hunt, or take game on the same day or the day following such flight. A person who violates this subsection (2) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two thousand dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points.

It is unlawful for two or more people on the ground, in a motor vehicle, or in a vessel to use electronic devices to communicate information in the furtherance of a violation of articles 1 to 6 of this title or of a commission rule. A person who violates this subsection (3) is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of two hundred dollars and an assessment of fifteen license suspension points.

A person who violates section 33-14.5-108 (3)(a) while engaged in the act of hunting, fishing, trapping, or a related activity at the time of the unlawful activity shall be punished by a penalty of ten license suspension points; except that, if the person was within a federal wilderness area at the time of the unlawful activity, the person shall be punished by a penalty of fifteen license suspension points. A person who violates section 33-14.5-108 (3)(b) while engaged in the act of hunting, fishing, or trapping or a related activity at the time of the unlawful activity shall be punished by a penalty of five license suspension points.

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article R&RE, p. 876, § 1, effective January 1, 1985.

L. 94:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1587, § 20, effective May 31.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1029, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(4) added, p. 145, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(4) amended, (SB 13-067), ch. 106, p. 368, § 1, effective April 4.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 33-6-114 as it existed prior to 1984.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act enacting subsection (4), see section 1 of chapter 54, Session Laws of Colorado 2008.